North Carolina, session 2025, HB749.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of nine million eight hundred eighteen thousand dollars
($9,818,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the City of Greensboro to use as follows:
(1) Nine million dollars ($9,000,000) to construct a new fire station to service the
north side of the Piedmont Triad International Airport.
(2) Eight hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($818,000) to relocate, enhance, and
operate the Police Department's Real Time Intelligence Center.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H749-v-1*